Connecticut, session 2026, SB00192.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17a-471a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services, in
consultation and coordination with the advisory council established
under subsection (b) of this section, shall develop policies and set
standards [related] relating to clients residing on the Connecticut Valley
Hospital campus and to the discharge of such clients from the hospital
into the adjacent community, and persons undergoing psychiatric
evaluation at Connecticut Valley Hospital. Any such policies and
standards shall (1) ensure that no discharge of any client admitted to
Whiting Forensic Hospital under commitment by the Superior Court or
transfer from the Department of Correction shall take place without full
compliance with sections 17a-511 to 17a-524, inclusive, 17a-566 to 17a-
575, inclusive, 17a-580 to 17a-603, inclusive, and 54-56d, and (2) require
persons undergoing psychiatric evaluation at Connecticut Valley
LCO No. 1145 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 192
Hospital to be separated according to their biological sex at all times.
(b) There is established a Connecticut Valley Hospital Advisory
Council that shall advise the Commissioner of Mental Health and
Addiction Services on policies concerning, but not limited to, building
use, security, clients residing on the campus and the discharge of clients
from the campus into the adjacent community. In addition, the advisory
council shall periodically review the implementation of the policies and
standards established by the commissioner in consultation with the
advisory council. The council shall be composed of six members
appointed by the mayor of Middletown, eight members appointed by
the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services and one
member who shall serve as chairperson appointed by the Governor. On
and after January 1, 2024, at least two members appointed by the
Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services shall have lived
experience with a behavioral health disorder.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 17a-471a